District of Columbia statutes.
16-5103

Penalties.

Any violation of § 16-1502 shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisonment of up to 180 days, or both.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-272, § 3(b), 54 DCR 856
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 281(g), 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 281(g) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “up to $500”.